Utah statutes.
38-5-2.   Judicial lien against water rights and related assets of a mutual benefit corporation.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Judicial lien" is defined in Section 16-6a-119.

(b)  "Mutual benefit corporation" is defined in Section 16-6a-102.

(c)  "Water rights and related assets" is defined in Section 16-6a-119.

(2)  A judicial lien recorded on or after May 12, 2009 against the water rights and related assets of a mutual benefit corporation is subject to Section 16-6a-119.

